Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2831.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 15-154, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-154. School safety program; purpose; program proposals; requirements; annual report; public records exemption; definitions A. The school safety program is established within the department of education to support, promote and enhance safe and effective learning environments for all students by supporting the costs of placing school resource officers, juvenile probation officers, school safety officers, school counselors and school social workers on school campuses. The school safety program may also support the costs of purchasing safety technology, safety training and infrastructure improvements for school campuses as provided in subsection D of this section.  A school district or charter school may apply to participate in the school safety program as provided in this section for up to three fiscal years by submitting by April 15 a program proposal to the department of education. A school district or charter school that receives approval for a three-year program under this subsection may annually submit a modified spending plan for its approved program. B. A program proposal submitted by a school district or charter school for supporting the costs of placing school resource officers, juvenile probation officers or school safety officers, or any combination of these officers, on a school campus shall contain: 1. A detailed description of the school safety needs of the charter school or school district. 2. A plan to provide the current school building blueprints, floor plans and school safety assessments for each school site to the local law enforcement agency, emergency medical services provider and fire department that provides services to the school site. 3. A plan for implementing a law-related education program or a plan that demonstrates the existence of a law-related education program as a school safety prevention strategy. 4. A plan to use trained school resource officers, juvenile probation officers or school safety officers, or any combination of these officers, in the school. 5. A plan to train school resource officers, juvenile probation officers or school safety officers, or any combination of these officers, on the family educational rights and privacy act, civil rights and adolescent mental health issues. 6. If the school district or charter school has already participated in the school safety program, information on the success, compliance and implementation of the most recent grant. C. A program proposal submitted by a school district or charter school for supporting the costs of placing school counselors or school social workers, or both, on a school campus shall contain: 1. A detailed description of the school safety needs of the charter school or school district. 2. A plan to provide the current school building blueprints, floor plans and school safety assessments for each school site to the local law enforcement agency, emergency medical services provider and fire department that provides services to the school site. 3. A plan for implementing a school guidance and counseling program that includes the following: (a) A detailed description of the relationship between the school counselor or the school social worker, or both, and local community resources. (b) A plan for using school counselor and school social worker services in the school, or both. (c) A detailed description of the methods for evaluating the effectiveness of the school guidance and counseling plan. (d) Policies on confidentiality under the school guidance and counseling plan. (e) Policies on notifying parents and other family members of issues or concerns as identified in the school guidance and counseling plan. (f) A detailed description of the school's, school district's or charter school's referral procedures to the appropriate community entities and state agencies. 4. If the school district or charter school has already participated in the school safety program, information on the success, compliance and implementation of the most recent approved program proposal. D. If a school district or charter school whose program proposal pursuant to subsection B or C of this section was approved by the state board of education cannot place one or more of the school resource officers, juvenile probation officers, school safety officers, school counselors or school social workers, or any combination of these individuals, as included in the approved program proposal, the school district or charter school may submit an alternative A program proposal submitted by a school district or charter school for supporting the costs of purchasing safety technology, safety training and infrastructure improvements for its school campus or campuses. An alternative program proposal submitted pursuant to this subsection shall contain: 1. A detailed description of the safety needs of the school district or charter school. 2. A detailed description of the proposed expenditures and capital improvements, including: (a) The safety needs that each proposed expenditure will address. (b) The specific technology or training program that the school district or charter school seeks to acquire. (c) For infrastructure improvements, all costs associated with the improvements, including architectural and engineering fees, safety evaluations and equipment for securing entrances and exits. 3. Any other information requested by the department of education. E. The department of education shall review and administer the school resource officers, juvenile probation officers and school safety officers program proposals in cooperation with the courts, law enforcement agencies and law-related education providers awarded a contract pursuant to section 41-2534, subject to review and approval by the state board of education. The department of education shall use relevant crime statistics to assess the needs of each program proposal and shall visit school districts and charter schools that submit program proposals in order to verify the information contained in the program proposals. The department of education shall contract to provide guidelines, curricula and support resources for school resource officers, juvenile probation officers and school safety officers to use in implementing a law-related education program. F. The department of education shall review and administer the school counselors and school social workers program proposals in cooperation with school administrators, principals, teachers, parents and community mental health professionals. The department of education shall use relevant school-level academic, social and emotional statistics to assess the needs of each program proposal and shall visit school districts and charter schools that submit program proposals in order to verify the information contained in the program proposals. G. The department of education shall review and administer the safety technology, safety training and infrastructure improvements program proposals. The department shall use relevant crime statistics to assess the needs of each program proposal and may visit school districts and charter schools that submit program proposals in order to verify the information contained in the program proposals. The department may approve all or part of a safety technology, safety training or infrastructure improvement program proposal. H. The department of education, subject to the review and approval of the state board of education, shall distribute monies to the school districts and charter schools that are in compliance with program requirements prescribed in this section and in section 15-154.02 and whose program proposals have been approved by the state board of education. I. The department of education shall review program proposals submitted by school districts and charter schools for participation in the school safety program and shall select school sites that are eligible to receive funding based on school safety needs pursuant to this section.  The department of education may prioritize program proposals for school resource officer, juvenile probation officer and school safety officer grants to school districts and charter schools that have agreements to share the cost of the school resource officer, juvenile probation officer or school safety officer with a law enforcement agency or the courts. J. The department of education shall evaluate the effectiveness of all the approved program proposals submitted pursuant to subsections B, C and D of this section within the school safety program and report on the activities of the program and the participants in the school safety program to the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives and the governor on or before November 1 of each year and shall provide a copy of this report to the secretary of state. The evaluation and report shall include survey results from participating schools and data from participating schools on the impact of participating in the school safety program. The department shall establish data guidelines for school safety program participants to follow in reporting pursuant to this subsection. K. The school safety program established by this section shall include a school safety program guidance manual adopted by the department of education that requires a dispute resolution process to be included in the service agreement between a school district or charter school that submitted a program proposal and received a school resource officer grant or school safety officer grant from the school safety program and the law enforcement agency that provides services to the school district or charter school. L. Any appropriations that are made to the department of education for the approved program proposals within the school safety program are exempt from the provisions of section 35-190 relating to lapsing of appropriations.  All monies that are not used for an approved program proposal within the school safety program during the fiscal year for which the monies were appropriated revert to the department of education for distribution to the program in the following fiscal year. M. Monies received by a school district or charter school under the school safety program shall be spent to implement the approved program proposals. N. The auditor general shall include the school safety program as part of its ongoing sunset review of agencies and programs. O. Notwithstanding any other law, school building blueprints and floor plans are not public records and are exempt from title 39, chapter 1. P. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Law-related education" means interactive education to equip children and youth with knowledge and skills pertaining to the law, school safety and effective citizenship. 2. "Law-related education program" means a program designed to provide children and youth with knowledge, skills and activities pertaining to the law and legal process and to promote law-abiding behavior with the purpose of preventing children and youth from engaging in delinquency or violence and enabling them to become productive citizens. 3. "School counselor" means a professional educator who holds a valid school counselor certificate issued by the department of education. 4. "School guidance and counseling program" means a counseling program that supports, promotes and enhances the academic, personal, social, emotional and career development of all students. 5. "School resource officer" means any of the following: (a) A peace officer. (b) A full-authority reserve peace officer who is certified by the Arizona peace officer standards and training board. (c) An individual who was previously employed as a peace officer in this state, who retired in good standing and who is assigned to participate in the school safety program by a law enforcement agency pursuant to section 15-155. 6. "School safety officer" means a school resource officer who is working in an off-duty capacity. 7. "School social worker" means a professional educator who holds a valid school social worker certificate issued by the department of education. END_STATUTE